Hawaii statutes.
[§321-543] Licensing. It shall
be unlawful for any person to operate as a durable medical equipment supplier
that sells, dispenses, delivers, or services durable medical equipment to a
consumer in the State without first obtaining a license. To receive a license,
a durable medical equipment supplier shall attest and provide corroborating
documentation to the department that the supplier:

(1) Is in compliance with the business registration
laws of the State and has all required tax identification numbers;

(2) Is licensed and in good standing in the state in
which its dispensing facilities are primarily located, if applicable, and
complies with all applicable state and federal laws, rules, and standards;

(3) Has designated a responsible agent or agents either
in or out of the State who will be responsible for providing timely and
satisfactory services to consumers in the State; provided that:

(A) The responsible agent or agents must be
available to consumers in the State by phone during standard business hours in
Hawaii to answer inquiries or resolve issues; and

(B) If the responsible agent or agents are
not immediately available, then the supplier shall have a system capable of
accepting and recording incoming phone inquiries; provided that the supplier
shall respond no later than one business day after the inquiry is received;

(4) Has implemented and maintains written procedures
at each location for handling complaints and problems from all consumers, which
includes a complaint file documenting complaints or problems and resolution of
the complaints or problems; and

(5) Will agree to notify consumers within two
business days if the supplier cannot or will not provide the equipment, item,
or service ordered; provided that suppliers may be exempt from this requirement
if selling, dispensing, delivering, or servicing specialty equipment or items.
[L 2016, c 137, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next